California statutes. Probate Code
This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. JUDICIAL PROCEEDINGS CONCERNING TRUSTS [17000. - 17457.]



  CHAPTER 1. Jurisdiction and Venue [17000. - 17006.]

17000.

(a) The superior court having jurisdiction over the trust pursuant to this part has exclusive jurisdiction of proceedings concerning the internal affairs of trusts.

(b) The superior court having jurisdiction over the trust pursuant to this part has concurrent jurisdiction of the following:

(1) Actions and proceedings to determine the existence of trusts.

(2) Actions and proceedings by or against creditors or debtors of trusts.

(3) Other actions and proceedings involving trustees and third persons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17001.

In proceedings commenced pursuant to this division, the court is a court of general jurisdiction and has all the powers of the superior court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 710, Sec. 44.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 48 of Ch. 710.)
-------------------------------------------

17002.

(a) The principal place of administration of the trust is the usual place where the day-to-day activity of the trust is carried on by the trustee or its representative who is primarily responsible for the administration of the trust.

(b) If the principal place of administration of the trust cannot be determined under subdivision (a), it shall be determined as follows:

(1) If the trust has a single trustee, the principal place of administration of the trust is the trustee’s residence or usual place of business.

(2) If the trust has more than one trustee, the principal place of administration of the trust is the residence or usual place of business of any of the cotrustees as agreed upon by them or, if not, the residence or usual place of business of any of the cotrustees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17003.

Subject to Section 17004:

(a) By accepting the trusteeship of a trust having its principal place of administration in this state the trustee submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court under this division.

(b) To the extent of their interests in the trust, all beneficiaries of a trust having its principal place of administration in this state are subject to the jurisdiction of the court under this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17004.

The court may exercise jurisdiction in proceedings under this division on any basis permitted by Section 410.10 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17005.

(a) The proper county for commencement of a proceeding pursuant to this division is either of the following:

(1) In the case of a living trust, the county where the principal place of administration of the trust is located.

(2) In the case of a testamentary trust, either the county where the decedent’s estate is administered or where the principal place of administration of the trust is located.

(b) If a living trust has no trustee, the proper county for commencement of a proceeding for appointing a trustee is the county where the trust property, or some portion of the trust property, is located.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (a) and (b), the proper county for commencement of a proceeding pursuant to this division is determined by the rules applicable to civil actions generally.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17006.

There is no right to a jury trial in proceedings under this division concerning the internal affairs of trusts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Notice [17100. - 17105.]

17100.

Except as otherwise provided in this division, notice in proceedings commenced pursuant to this division, or notice otherwise required by this division, is governed by Part 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

17105.

A petitioner or other person required to give notice may cause notice to be given to any person interested in the trust without the need for a court order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Proceedings Concerning Trusts [17200. - 17211.]

17200.

(a) Except as provided in Section 15800, a trustee or beneficiary of a trust may petition the court under this chapter concerning the internal affairs of the trust or to determine the existence of the trust.

(b) Proceedings concerning the internal affairs of a trust include, but are not limited to, proceedings for any of the following purposes:

(1) Determining questions of construction of a trust instrument.

(2) Determining the existence or nonexistence of any immunity, power, privilege, duty, or right.

(3) Determining the validity of a trust provision.

(4) Ascertaining beneficiaries and determining to whom property shall pass or be delivered upon final or partial termination of the trust, to the extent the determination is not made by the trust instrument.

(5) Settling the accounts and passing upon the acts of the trustee, including the exercise of discretionary powers.

(6) Instructing the trustee.

(7) Compelling the trustee to do any of the following:

(A) Provide a copy of the terms of the trust.

(B) Provide
 information about the trust under Section 16061 if the trustee has failed to provide the requested information within 60 days after the beneficiary’s reasonable written request, and the beneficiary has not received the requested information from the trustee within the six months preceding the request.

(C) Account to the beneficiary, subject to the provisions of Section 16064, if the trustee has failed to submit a requested account within 60 days after written request of the beneficiary and
 no account has been made within six months preceding the request.

(8) Granting powers to the trustee.

(9) Fixing or allowing payment of the trustee’s compensation or reviewing the reasonableness of the trustee’s compensation.

(10) Appointing or removing a trustee.

(11) Accepting the resignation of a trustee.

(12) Compelling redress of a breach of the trust by any available remedy.

(13) Approving or directing the modification or termination of the trust.

(14) Approving or directing the combination or division of trusts.

(15) Amending or conforming the trust instrument in the manner required to qualify a decedent’s estate for the charitable estate tax deduction under federal law, including the addition of mandatory governing instrument requirements for a charitable remainder trust as required by final regulations and rulings of the United States Internal Revenue Service.

(16) Authorizing or directing transfer of a trust or trust property to or from another jurisdiction.

(17) Directing transfer of a testamentary trust subject to continuing court jurisdiction from one county to another.

(18) Approving removal of a testamentary trust from continuing court jurisdiction.

(19) Reforming or excusing compliance with the governing instrument of an organization pursuant to Section 16105.

(20) Determining the liability of the trust for any debts of a deceased settlor. However, nothing in this paragraph shall provide standing to bring an action concerning the internal affairs of the trust to a person whose only claim to the assets of the decedent is as a creditor.

(21) Determining petitions filed pursuant to Section 15687 and reviewing the reasonableness of compensation for legal services authorized under that section. In determining the reasonableness of compensation under this paragraph, the court may consider, together with all other relevant circumstances, whether prior approval was obtained pursuant to Section 15687.

(22) If
 a member of the State Bar of California has transferred the economic interest of his or her practice to a trustee and if the member is a deceased member under Section 9764, a petition may be brought to appoint a practice administrator. The procedures, including, but not limited to, notice requirements, that apply to the appointment of a practice administrator for a deceased member shall apply to the petition brought under this section.

(23) If a member of the State Bar of California has transferred the economic interest of his or her practice to a trustee and if the member is a disabled member under Section 2468, a petition may be brought to appoint a practice administrator. The procedures, including, but not limited to, notice requirements, that apply to the appointment of a practice administrator for a disabled member shall apply to the petition brought under this section.

(c) The court may, on its own motion, set and give notice of an order to show cause why a trustee who is a professional fiduciary, and who is required to be licensed under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, should not be removed for failing to hold a valid, unexpired, unsuspended license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 621, Sec. 11.   (SB 202)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17200.1.

All proceedings concerning the transfer of property of the trust shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of Part 19 (commencing with Section 850) of Division 2.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 49, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17201.

A proceeding under this chapter is commenced by filing a petition stating facts showing that the petition is authorized under this chapter. The petition shall also state the grounds of the petition and the names and addresses of each person entitled to notice of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 862, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

17201.1.

A petitioner in a proceeding under Section 17200 may commence discovery upon a trustee in accordance with the same time periods set forth in the Civil Discovery Act (Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure) except that the time periods shall commence to run upon service of the petition and notice of hearing upon the trustee or the trustee’s appearance in the proceeding, whichever first occurs. Nothing in this section shall alter when a respondent in such a proceeding may commence discovery.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 32, Sec. 4.   (AB 308)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17202.

The court may dismiss a petition if it appears that the proceeding is not reasonably necessary for the protection of the interests of the trustee or beneficiary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17203.

(a) At least 30 days before the time set for the hearing on the petition, the petitioner shall cause notice of hearing to be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to all of the following persons:

(1) All trustees.

(2) All beneficiaries, subject to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15800) of Part 3.

(3) The Attorney General, if the petition relates to a charitable trust subject to the jurisdiction of the Attorney General.

(b) At least 30 days before the time set for hearing on
 the petition, the petitioner shall cause notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition to be served in the manner provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure on any person, other than a trustee or beneficiary, whose right, title, or interest would be affected by the petition and who does not receive notice pursuant to subdivision (a). The court may not shorten the time for giving notice under this subdivision.

(c) If a person to whom notice otherwise would be given has been deceased for at least 40 days, and no personal representative has been appointed for the estate of that person, and the deceased person’s right, title, or interest has not passed to any other person pursuant to Division 8 (commencing with Section 13000) or otherwise, notice may instead be given to
 the following persons:

(1) Each heir and devisee of the decedent, and all persons named as executors of the will of the decedent, so far as known to the petitioner.

(2) Each person serving as guardian or conservator of the decedent at the time of the decedent’s death, so far as known to the petitioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 94.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17204.

(a) If proceedings involving a trust are pending, a beneficiary of the trust may, in person or by attorney, file with the court clerk where the proceedings are pending a written request stating that the beneficiary desires special notice of the filing of petitions in the proceeding relating to any or all of the purposes described in Section 17200 and giving an address for receiving notice by mail. A copy of the request shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to the trustee or the trustee’s attorney. If personally delivered, the request shall be effective when it is delivered. If mailed or electronically delivered, the request shall be effective when it is received. When the original of the request is filed
 with the court clerk, it shall be accompanied by a written admission or proof of service. A request for special notice may be modified or withdrawn in the same manner as provided for the making of the initial request.

(b) (1) An interested person may request special notice in the same manner as a beneficiary under subdivision (a), for the purpose set forth in paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) of Section 17200. The request for special notice shall be accompanied by a verified statement of the person’s interest.

(2) For purposes set forth in paragraphs (2), (4) to (6), inclusive, (8), (12), (16), (20), and (21) of subdivision (b) of Section 17200, an interested person may petition the court for an order for special notice of proceedings involving a trust. The
 petition shall include a verified statement of the creditor’s interest and may be served on the trustee or the trustee’s attorney in a manner described in Section 1215. The petition may be made by ex parte application.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, an “interested person” means only a creditor of a trust or, if the trust has become irrevocable upon the death of a trustor, a creditor of the trustor.

(4) This section does not confer standing on an interested person if standing does not otherwise exist.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), after serving and filing a request and proof of service pursuant to subdivision (a) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the beneficiary or the interested person is entitled to
 notice pursuant to Section 17203. If the petition of an interested person filed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) is granted by the court, the interested person is entitled to notice pursuant to Section 17203.

(d) A request for special notice made by a beneficiary whose right to notice is restricted by Section 15802 is not effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 95.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17205.

If a trustee or beneficiary has served and filed either a notice of appearance, in person or by counsel, directed to the petitioner or the petitioner’s counsel in connection with a particular petition and proceeding or a written request for a copy of the petition, and has given an address to which notice or a copy of the petition may be delivered pursuant to Section 1215, the petitioner shall cause a copy of the petition to be delivered to that person within five days after service of the notice of appearance or receipt of the request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 96.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17206.

The court in its discretion may make any orders and take any other action necessary or proper to dispose of the matters presented by the petition, including appointment of a temporary trustee to administer the trust in whole or in part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17209.

The administration of trusts is intended to proceed expeditiously and free of judicial intervention, subject to the jurisdiction of the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17210.

In a case involving a charitable trust subject to the jurisdiction of the Attorney General, the Attorney General may petition under this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17211.

(a) If a beneficiary contests the trustee’s account and the court determines that the contest was without reasonable cause and in bad faith, the court may award against the contestant the compensation and costs of the trustee and other expenses and costs of litigation, including attorney’s fees, incurred to defend the account. The amount awarded shall be a charge against any interest of the beneficiary in the trust. The contestant shall be personally liable for any amount that remains unsatisfied.

(b) If a beneficiary contests the trustee’s account and the court determines that the trustee’s opposition to the contest was without reasonable cause and in bad faith, the court may award the contestant the costs of the contestant and other expenses and costs of litigation, including attorney’s fees, incurred to contest the account. The amount awarded shall be a charge against the compensation or other interest of the trustee in the trust. The trustee shall be personally liable and on the bond, if any, for any amount that remains unsatisfied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 563, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Testamentary Trusts Subject to Continuing Court Jurisdiction [17300. - 17354.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration of Testamentary Trusts Subject to Continuing Court Jurisdiction [17300. - 17304.]

17300.

This article applies only to the following:

(a) A trust created by a will executed before July 1, 1977, and not incorporated by reference in a will on or after July 1, 1977.

(b) A trust created by a will which provides that the trust is subject to the continuing jurisdiction of the superior court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17301.

If a trust described in Section 17300 continues after distribution of the decedent’s estate, the court in which the decedent’s estate was administered retains jurisdiction over the trust for any of the purposes specified in Section 17200.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17302.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, proceedings relating to trusts under continuing court jurisdiction are governed by this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17303.

This article does not apply to a trust described in Section 17300 that has been removed from continuing court jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17304.

(a) At any time after final distribution of the decedent’s estate, a trust described in Section 17300 may be transferred to a different county in this state as provided in this section.

(b) The petition for transfer shall set forth all of the following:

(1) The name of the county to which jurisdiction over the trust is sought to be transferred.

(2) The names, ages, and places of residence of the trustees and all beneficiaries of the trust, so far as known to the petitioner.

(3) A brief description of the character, condition, value, and location of property of the trust.

(4) A brief statement of the reasons for transfer.

(c) If, after hearing, it appears to the court that the transfer of jurisdiction to the county designated in the petition or to any other county in this state will be in the best interests of the estate, or that economical and convenient administration of the trust will be facilitated by the transfer, the court shall make an order transferring jurisdiction over the trust. Upon such order, the court clerk shall certify a copy of the order of transfer to the clerk of the court to which jurisdiction is transferred, together with copies of the instrument creating the trust, the decree of distribution, and any other documents or matters of record the court determines by order to be necessary to define the powers and duties of the trustee, or otherwise to be necessary in connection with further administration of the trust.

(d) The court to which jurisdiction is transferred may from time to time require by order the filing of certified copies of additional papers or matters of record from the court in which the decedent’s estate was administered as are required.

(e) Upon the filing of a certified copy of the order of transfer, together with supporting documents, the court to which jurisdiction is transferred has the same jurisdiction over the trust as the court in which the decedent’s estate was administered but for the transfer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Removal of Trusts From Continuing Court Jurisdiction [17350. - 17354.]

17350.

This article applies only to trusts created by will executed before July 1, 1977, and not incorporated by reference in a will on or after July 1, 1977.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17351.

(a) If any of the trustees of a trust described in Section 17350 is a trust company, the trust shall be removed from continuing court jurisdiction as provided in this section. Within six months after the initial funding of the trust, the trustee shall give a notice of removal of the trust from continuing court jurisdiction to each beneficiary. Notice of removal shall be sent by registered or certified mail or by first-class mail, but notice sent by first-class mail is effective only if an acknowledgment of receipt of notice is signed by the beneficiary and returned to the trustee.

(b) The notice of removal of the trust from continuing court jurisdiction shall contain the following:

(1) A statement that as of January 1, 1983, the law was changed to remove the necessity for continuing court jurisdiction over the trust.

(2) A statement that Section 17200 of the Probate Code gives any beneficiary the right to petition a court to determine important matters relating to the administration of the trust.

(3) A copy of the text of Sections 17200 and 17201.

(4) A statement that each income beneficiary, as defined in Section 16325, is entitled to an annual statement of the principal and income receipts and disbursements of the trust and that any other beneficiary is entitled to such information upon written request to the trustee.

(5) The name and location of the court in the county in which it is appropriate to file a petition pursuant to Section 17200, the name and location of the court that had jurisdiction over the administration of the decedent’s estate, and a statement that it is appropriate to file a petition pursuant to Section 17200 with either court.

(c) The trustee shall file with the court that had jurisdiction over the administration of the decedent’s estate proof of giving notice under this section within seven months after the initial funding of the trust.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 145, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17352.

(a) If none of the trustees of a trust described in Section 17350 is a trust company, the trust may be removed from continuing court jurisdiction only with approval of the court. The trustee may petition for court approval at any time, and from time to time, in the trustee’s discretion.

(b) The petition for removal shall set forth the trust accounts in detail, report the trustee’s acts, and show the condition of the trust estate. A copy of the trust instrument shall be attached to the petition.

(c) At the hearing the court may receive testimony from any interested person and may grant or deny the petition, or may grant the petition on such conditions as the court in its discretion deems proper.

(d) If the petition is granted, the trustee shall send the notice of removal of the trust provided in subdivision (b) of Section 17351 and file proof of service as required by subdivision (c) of Section 17351 within six months and seven months, respectively, from the date the petition is granted. A copy of the court order granting the petition shall be attached to the notice.

(e) If the petition is not granted, the trust shall continue to be administered under Article 1 (commencing with Section 17300) as if the settlor had provided in the will that the court does not lose jurisdiction of the estate by final distribution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17353.

If a trust company is appointed as a successor trustee of a trust which, at the time of the appointment, is subject to continuing court jurisdiction because it was not removed pursuant to Section 17352, the successor trustee shall comply with Section 17351. For the purpose of complying with Section 17351, the date of appointment of the successor trustee shall be treated as the date of initial funding of the trust.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17354.

After a trust is removed from continuing court jurisdiction pursuant to this article, neither a change in trustees nor any other event causes the trust to be subject to continuing court jurisdiction under Article 1 (commencing with Section 17300).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Transfer of Trust to Another Jurisdiction [17400. - 17405.]

17400.

(a) This chapter applies to all of the following:

(1) A trust that is subject to this division.

(2) A trust subject to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 6320) of Part 1 of Division 6.

(3) Any other trust to which the provisions of this chapter are made applicable by statute or trust instrument.

(b) This chapter does not prevent the transfer of the place of administration of a trust or of trust property to another jurisdiction by any other available means.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17401.

(a) The court may make an order for the transfer of the place of administration of a trust or the transfer of some or all of the trust property to a jurisdiction outside this state as provided in this chapter.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, proceedings under this chapter are governed by this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17402.

The petition for transfer shall set forth all of the following:

(a) The names and places of residence of the following:

(1) The trustee administering the trust in this state.

(2) The trustee, including any domiciliary trustee, who will administer the trust or trust property in the other jurisdiction.

(b) The names, ages, and places of residence of the living beneficiaries, as far as known to the petitioner.

(c) Whether the trustee who will administer the trust in the other jurisdiction has agreed to accept the trust. If so, the acceptance or a copy shall be attached as an exhibit to the petition or otherwise filed with the court.

(d) A general statement of the qualifications of the trustee who will administer the trust in the other jurisdiction and the amount of fiduciary bond, if any. If the trustee is an individual, the statement shall include the trustee’s age.

(e) A general statement of the nature and value of the property of any trust of the same settlor being administered in the other jurisdiction by the trustee who will administer the trust in the other jurisdiction.

(f) The name of the court, if any, having jurisdiction of the trustee in the other jurisdiction or of its accounts or in which a proceeding may be had with respect to administration of the trust or the trustee’s accounts.

(g) A statement of the character, condition, location, and value of the trust property sought to be transferred.

(h) Whether there is any pending civil action in this state against the trustee arising out of the administration of the trust sought to be transferred.

(i) A statement of the reasons for the transfer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17403.

(a) At least 30 days before the time set for the hearing on the petition, the petitioner shall cause notice of the time and place of the hearing to be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to each of the persons named in the petition at their respective addresses as stated in the petition.

(b) Any person interested in the trust, as trustee, beneficiary, or otherwise, may appear and file written grounds in opposition to the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 97.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17404.

The court may, in its discretion, grant the petition and order the trustee to transfer the trust property or to transfer the place of administration of the trust to the other jurisdiction if, after hearing, all of the following appear to the court:

(a) The transfer of the trust property to a trustee in another jurisdiction, or the transfer of the place of administration of the trust to another jurisdiction, will promote the best interests of the trust and those interested in it, taking into account the interest in the economical and convenient administration of the trust.

(b) The transfer will not violate the trust instrument.

(c) Any new trustee to whom the trust property is to be transferred is qualified, willing, and able to administer the trust or trust property under the trust instrument.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17405.

If a transfer is ordered under this chapter, the court may direct the manner of transfer and impose terms and conditions as may be just, including, but not limited to, a requirement for the substitution of a successor trustee in any pending litigation in this state. The delivery of property in accordance with the order of the court is a full discharge of the trustee in relation to all property embraced in the order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Transfer of Trust From Another Jurisdiction [17450. - 17457.]

17450.

(a) This chapter applies to a trust, or portion thereof, administered in a jurisdiction outside this state.

(b) This chapter does not prevent the transfer of the place of administration of a trust or of trust property to this state by any other available means.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17451.

(a) The court may make an order accepting the transfer of the place of administration of a trust from another jurisdiction to this state or the transfer of some or all of the trust property in another jurisdiction to a trustee in this state as provided in this chapter.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, proceedings under this chapter are governed by this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17452.

(a) If the petition requests that a resident of this state be appointed trustee, the petition shall be filed in the court of the county where the proposed principal place of administration of the trust pursuant to Section 17002 is located.

(b) If the petition requests that only a nonresident of this state be appointed trustee, the petition shall be filed in the court of the county where either (1) any beneficiary resides or (2) a substantial portion of the trust property to be transferred is located or will be located.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17453.

The petition for transfer shall set forth all of the following:

(a) The names and places of residence of the following:

(1) The trustee administering the trust in the other jurisdiction.

(2) The proposed trustee to whom administration of the trust or trust property will be transferred.

(b) The names, ages, and places of residence of all living beneficiaries, as far as known to the petitioner.

(c) Whether administration of the trust has been subject to supervision in a jurisdiction outside this state. If so, the petition shall state whether a petition or appropriate request for transfer of place of administration of the trust or trust property to this state has been filed, if necessary, with the court in the other jurisdiction, and the status of the petition or request.

(d) Whether the trustee proposed to administer the trust in this state has agreed to accept the trust in this state. If the trustee has agreed, the acceptance shall be attached as an exhibit to the petition or otherwise filed with the court.

(e) A general statement of the qualifications of the trustee proposed to administer the trust in this state and the amount of any bond to be requested. If the trustee is an individual, the statement shall include the trustee’s age.

(f) A copy of the trust instrument or a statement of the terms of the trust instrument in effect at the time the petition is filed, including all amendments thereto.

(g) A statement of the character, condition, location, and value of the trust property sought to be transferred.

(h) A statement of the reasons for the transfer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17454.

(a) At least 30 days before the time set for the hearing on the petition, the petitioner shall cause notice of the time and place of the hearing to be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to each of the persons named in the petition at their respective addresses as stated in the petition.

(b) Any person interested in the trust, as trustee, beneficiary, or otherwise, may appear and file written grounds in opposition to the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 98.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17455.

(a) The court may, in its discretion, grant the petition and issue an order accepting transfer of trust property or the place of administration of the trust to this state and appoint a trustee to administer the trust in this state, if, after hearing, all of the following appear to the court:

(1) The transfer of the trust property to a trustee in this state, or the transfer of the place of administration of the trust to this state, will promote the best interests of the trust and those interested in it, taking into account the interest in the economical and convenient administration of the trust.

(2) The transfer will not violate the trust instrument.

(3) The trustee appointed by the court to administer the trust in this state, and to whom the trust property is to be transferred, is qualified, willing, and able to administer the trust or trust property under the trust instrument.

(4) The proper court in the other jurisdiction has approved the transfer if approval is necessary under the law of the other jurisdiction.

(b) If the court grants the petition under subdivision (a), the court shall require the trustee to give a bond, if necessary under the law of the other jurisdiction or of this state, and may require bond as provided in Section 15602.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17456.

If appropriate to facilitate transfer of the trust property or the place of administration of a trust to this state, the court may issue a conditional order appointing a trustee to administer the trust in this state and indicating that transfer to this state will be accepted if transfer is approved by the proper court of the other jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

17457.

A trust transferred to this state pursuant to this chapter shall be administered in the same manner as a trust of that type created in this state. The validity of a trust and the construction of the beneficial provisions of a trust transferred to this state are not affected by this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. RIGHTS OF THIRD PERSONS [18000. - 18201.]



  CHAPTER 1. Liability of Trustee to Third Persons [18000. - 18005.]

18000.

(a) Unless otherwise provided in the contract or in this chapter, a trustee is not personally liable on a contract properly entered into in the trustee’s fiduciary capacity in the course of administration of the trust unless the trustee fails to reveal the trustee’s representative capacity or identify the trust in the contract.

(b) The personal liability of a trustee on a contract entered into before July 1, 1987, is governed by prior law and not by this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18001.

A trustee is personally liable for obligations arising from ownership or control of trust property only if the trustee is personally at fault.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18002.

A trustee is personally liable for torts committed in the course of administration of the trust only if the trustee is personally at fault.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18003.

(a) A cotrustee who does not join in exercising a power held by three or more cotrustees is not liable to third persons for the consequences of the exercise of the power.

(b) A dissenting cotrustee who joins in an action at the direction of the majority cotrustees is not liable to third persons for the action if the dissenting cotrustee expresses the dissent in writing to any other cotrustee at or before the time the action is taken.

(c) This section does not excuse a cotrustee from liability for failure to discharge the cotrustee’s duties as a trustee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18004.

A claim based on a contract entered into by a trustee in the trustee’s representative capacity, on an obligation arising from ownership or control of trust property, or on a tort committed in the course of administration of the trust may be asserted against the trust by proceeding against the trustee in the trustee’s representative capacity, whether or not the trustee is personally liable on the claim.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)